Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.200

Quieting title to tax-title property—Judgment.

At any time after the return day named in the summons and notice the plaintiff in the cause shall be entitled to apply for judgment. In case any person has appeared in such action and claimed any interest in the real property involved adverse to that of the county or its successors in interest, such person shall be given a three days' notice of the time when application for judgment shall be made. The court shall hear and determine the matter in a summary manner similar to that provided in RCW 84.64.080, relating to judgment and order of sale in general tax foreclosure proceedings, and shall pronounce and enter judgment according to the rights of the parties and persons concerned in the action. No order of sale shall be made nor shall any sale on execution be necessary to determine the title of the county to the real property involved in such action.

[ 1961 c 15 s 84.64.370. Prior: 1931 c 83 s 4; 1925 ex.s. c 171 s 5; RRS s 11308-5. Formerly RCW 84.64.370.]